Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1101 to 38-1153 shall be known and may be cited as the Dentistry Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 434;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB18, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB148, § 3.